trunk/apertium-mk-en/apertium-mk-en.mk.dix
  <pardef n="плат/и__vblex">	<!-- perf perf"/><s n="iv --> <!-- свършен вид --> <!-- същото като нос/и но всъщност има аорист--> 
     <e>        <p>          <l>и</l>          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
     <e>        <p>          <l>ете</l>          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

     <e>        <p>          <l>ам</l>          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
     <e>        <p>          <l>иш</l>          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
     <e>        <p>          <l>и</l>          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
     <e>        <p>          <l>име</l>          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
     <e>        <p>          <l>ите</l>          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
     <e>        <p>          <l>ат</l>          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

     <e>        <p>          <l>ев</l>          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
     <e>        <p>          <l>еше</l>         <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
     <e>        <p>          <l>еше</l>         <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
     <e>        <p>          <l>евме</l>        <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
     <e>        <p>          <l>евте</l>        <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
     <e>        <p>          <l>еа</l>          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

     <e>        <p>          <l>ел</l>          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="pii"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
     <e>        <p>          <l>ела</l>         <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="pii"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
     <e>        <p>          <l>ело</l>         <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="pii"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
     <e>        <p>          <l>еле</l>         <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="pii"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

     <e>        <p>          <l>ив</l>          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
     <e>        <p>          <l>и</l>          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
     <e>        <p>          <l>и</l>          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
     <e>        <p>          <l>ивме</l>          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
     <e>        <p>          <l>ивте</l>          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
     <e>        <p>          <l>ија</l>          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

     <e>        <p>          <l>ил</l>          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
     <e>        <p>          <l>ила</l>         <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
     <e>        <p>          <l>ило</l>         <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
     <e>        <p>          <l>иле</l>         <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

     <e>        <p>          <l>ен</l>          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
     <e>        <p>          <l>ениот</l>          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
     <e>        <p>          <l>ениов</l>          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prx"/></r></p></e>
     <e>        <p>          <l>енион</l>          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dst"/></r></p></e>
     <e>        <p>          <l>ена</l>         <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
     <e>        <p>          <l>ената</l>         <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
     <e>        <p>          <l>енава</l>         <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prx"/></r></p></e>
     <e>        <p>          <l>енана</l>         <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dst"/></r></p></e>
     <e>        <p>          <l>ено</l>         <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
     <e>        <p>          <l>еното</l>         <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
     <e>        <p>          <l>еново</l>         <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prx"/></r></p></e>
     <e>        <p>          <l>еноно</l>         <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dst"/></r></p></e>
     <e>        <p>          <l>ени</l>         <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
     <e>        <p>          <l>ените</l>         <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
     <e>        <p>          <l>ениве</l>         <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prx"/></r></p></e>
     <e>        <p>          <l>енине</l>         <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dst"/></r></p></e>

   </pardef>

	<e lm="плати"><i>плат</i><par n="плат/и__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="одрази"><i>одраз</i><par n="плат/и__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="заврши"><i>заврш</i><par n="плат/и__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="прифати"><i>прифат</i><par n="плат/и__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="обрати"><i>обрат</i><par n="плат/и__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="поздрави"><i>поздрав</i><par n="плат/и__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="наштети"><i>наштет</i><par n="плат/и__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="настапи"><i>настап</i><par n="плат/и__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="пристапи"><i>пристап</i><par n="плат/и__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="справи се"><i>справ</i><par n="плат/и__vblex"/><p><l><b/>се</l><r><g><b/>се</g></r></p></e>
	<e lm="продолжи"><i>продолж</i><par n="плат/и__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="приближи"><i>приближ</i><par n="плат/и__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="доближи"><i>доближ</i><par n="плат/и__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="попречи"><i>попреч</i><par n="плат/и__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="победи"><i>побед</i><par n="плат/и__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="појави"><i>појав</i><par n="плат/и__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="изгуби"><i>изгуб</i><par n="плат/и__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="отвори"><i>отвор</i><par n="плат/и__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="стапи"><i>стап</i><par n="плат/и__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="заоди"><i>заод</i><par n="плат/и__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="изоди"><i>изод</i><par n="плат/и__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="пооди"><i>поод</i><par n="плат/и__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="прооди"><i>проод</i><par n="плат/и__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="завиди"><i>завид</i><par n="плат/и__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="услужи"><i>услуж</i><par n="плат/и__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="привиди"><i>привид</i><par n="плат/и__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="дослужи"><i>дослуж</i><par n="плат/и__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="застапи"><i>застап</i><par n="плат/и__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="отстапи"><i>отстап</i><par n="плат/и__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="послужи"><i>послуж</i><par n="плат/и__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="постапи"><i>постап</i><par n="плат/и__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="престапи"><i>престап</i><par n="плат/и__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="развидели"><i>развидел</i><par n="плат/и__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="богослужи"><i>богослуж</i><par n="плат/и__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="поотстапи"><i>поотстап</i><par n="плат/и__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="поразвидели"><i>поразвидел</i><par n="плат/и__vblex"/></e>
